District of Columbia statutes.
7-2502.05

Application signed under oath; fees.

(a)

Each applicant (the president or chief executive in the case of an organization) shall sign an oath or affirmation attesting to the truth of all the information required by § 7-2502.03 or § 7-2502.07a.

(b)

Each application required by this subchapter shall be accompanied by a nonrefundable fee to be established by the Mayor; provided, that such fee shall, in the judgment of the Mayor, reimburse the District for the cost of services provided under this subchapter.

(c)

Any declaration, certificate, verification, or statement made for purposes of firearm registration under this title shall be made under penalty of perjury pursuant to D.C. Official Code § 22-2402. Except as required in § 7-2502.03(a)(1), no document shall be required to be notarized.

Sept. 24, 1976, D.C. Law 1-85, title II, § 205, 23 DCR 2464
Mar. 31, 2009, D.C. Law 17-372, § 3(f), 56 DCR 1365
Sept. 29, 2012, D.C. Law 19-170, § 2(f), 59 DCR 5691
This section is referenced in § 7-2507.06.
1981 Ed., § 6-2315.
1973 Ed., § 6-1815.
D.C. Law 17-372, in subsec. (a), substituted “§§ 7-2502.03 or § 7-2502.07a” for “§ 7-2502.03”.
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-170 added (c).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(f) of Firearms Registration Emergency Amendment Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-651, January 6, 2009, 56 DCR 911).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(f) of Firearms Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-352, May 11, 2012, 59 DCR 5116).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(f) of the Firearms Amendments Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-394, July 18, 2012, 59 DCR 8694).
For temporary addition of (c), see § 2(f) of the Firearms Second Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-510, October 26, 2012, 59 DCR 12808).
Delegation of Authority pursuant to D.C. Law 1-85, the Firearms Control Regulation Act of 1975